Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202019-4029.02
Change of boundaries or functions or ordinance provisions; procedure; ordinance; hearing.

Upon receiving a recommendation to change the boundaries or the functions or ordinance provisions of an existing business improvement district from the business improvement board, the city council may change the boundaries or the functions or ordinance provisions of one or more business improvement districts by adopting an ordinance to that effect. Prior to adopting the ordinance, a hearing shall be held to consider the ordinance.

Laws 2015, LB168, § 12;

Laws 2020, LB68, § 4.